changeRCons.twol
Alphabet
A B C Ç D E F G Ğ H I İ J K L M N O Ö P R S Ş T U Ü V Y Z
a b c ç d e f g ğ h ı i j k l m n o ö p r s ş t u ü v y z
%{A%}
%{I%}
%{D%}
%{C%}
%{K%}
%{SPC%}
%-
%{rT%}:t
%{rÇ%}:ç
%{rK%}:k
%{rP%}:p
%{Ph1%}
%{Ph2%}
%{Ph3%}
%{Ph4%}
%{Ph5%}
%{Ph6%}
%{Ph7%}
%{Ph8%}
%{Ph9%}
%{rEİ%}
%{rEÜ%}
%{rAU%}
%{rAI%}
%'
;

Sets

Vow = A E I İ O Ö U Ü
		a e ı i o ö u ü %{A%} %{I%} %{rEİ%} %{rEÜ%} %{rAU%} %{rAI%};

Cons = B C Ç D F G Ğ H J K L M N P R S Ş T V Y Z
		b c ç d f g ğ h j k l m n p r s ş t v y z %' ;

Rules

"T to d"
%{rT%}:d <=> _ [%-: ]* [Vow: ] ;

"Ç to c"
%{rÇ%}:c <=> _ [%-: ]* [Vow: ] ;

"P to b"
%{rP%}:b <=> _ [%-: ]* [Vow: ] ;

"K to ğ"
%{rK%}:ğ <=> \[n: ] _ [%-: ]* [Vow: ] ;

"K to g"
%{rK%}:g <=> [n: ] _ [%-: ]* [Vow: ] ;
